algorithm/arabic_root.sbl
        define Suffix_Noun_Step2c1 as (
            $word_len = len
            [substring] among (
                '{t}' ($word_len >= 4 delete)
            )
        )
        define Suffix_Noun_Step2c2 as ( // feminine t_
            $word_len = len
            [substring] among (
                '{t_}' ($word_len >= 3 delete)
                '{t}{a}{n}' '{t}{y}{n}' ($word_len >= 5 delete)
            )
        )
        define Suffix_Noun_Step3 as ( // ya' nisbiya
            $word_len = len
            [substring] among (
                '{y}' ($word_len >= 3 delete)
            )
        )

        define Suffix_Verb_Step1 as (
                $word_len = len
                [substring] among (
                        '{e}' '{k}' ($word_len >= 4 delete)
                        '{n}{y}' '{n}{a}' '{e}{a}' '{e}{m}' '{e}{n}' '{k}{m}' '{k}{n}' ($word_len >= 5 delete)
                        '{e}{m}{a}' '{k}{m}{a}' '{k}{m}{w}'($word_len >= 6 delete)
                )
            )
        define Suffix_Verb_Step2a as (
                $word_len = len
                [substring] among (
                       '{t}' ($word_len >= 4  delete)
                        '{a}' '{n}' '{y}' ($word_len >= 4 delete)
                        '{n}{a}' '{t}{a}'  '{t}{n}'  ($word_len >= 5 delete)// past
                        '{a}{n}' '{w}{n}' '{y}{n}' ($word_len > 5 delete) // present
                        '{t}{m}{a}' ($word_len >= 6 delete)
                )
            )

        define Suffix_Verb_Step2b as (
            $word_len = len
            [substring] among (
                '{w}{a}' '{t}{m}' ($word_len >= 5 delete) // len >= 5
            )
        )


        define Suffix_Verb_Step2c as (
            $word_len = len
            [substring] among (
                '{w}' ($word_len >= 4 delete)
                '{t}{m}{w}' ($word_len >= 6 delete)
            )
        )

        define Suffix_All_alef_maqsura as (
            $word_len = len
            [substring] among (
                '{a_}' ( <- '{y}' ) // spell error
                // '{a_}' ( delete ) // if noun > 3
                // '{a_}' ( <- '{a}') // if verb
            )
        )
)

define stem as (
    // set initial values
    set is_noun
    set is_verb
    unset is_defined

    // guess type and properties
    do Checks1
    backwards ( do Checks2 )

    // normalization pre-stemming
    do Normalize_pre


    backwards (

       do (
              //Suffixes for verbs
            (
           is_verb
           (
               (
                  (atleast 1 Suffix_Verb_Step1)
                  ( Suffix_Verb_Step2a or Suffix_Verb_Step2c  or next)
                )
                or Suffix_Verb_Step2b
                or Suffix_Verb_Step2a
            )
           )
            //Suffixes for nouns
          or (
               is_noun
                (

                 try (
                     Suffix_Noun_Step2c2
                     or (not is_defined Suffix_Noun_Step1a (
                            Suffix_Noun_Step2a
                            or Suffix_Noun_Step2b
                            or Suffix_Noun_Step2c1
                            or next))
                     or (Suffix_Noun_Step1b (
                            Suffix_Noun_Step2a
                            or Suffix_Noun_Step2b
                            or Suffix_Noun_Step2c1))
                     or (not is_defined Suffix_Noun_Step2a)
                     or (Suffix_Noun_Step2b)
                 )
                 Suffix_Noun_Step3
                 )

            )

            // Suffixes for alef maqsura
            or  Suffix_All_alef_maqsura
        )
    )

    //Prefixes
    do (
       try Prefix_Step1
       try ( Prefix_Step2a or Prefix_Step2b )
       ( Prefix_Step3a_Noun
         or (is_noun Prefix_Step3b_Noun)
         or (is_verb try Prefix_Step3_Verb Prefix_Step4_Verb)
         )
    )
    // normalization post-stemming
    do Normalize_post // for stem
    => root
    $root( do (Pattern_Step1c1  or Pattern_Step2b or Pattern_Step3a))
    $root backwards ( do Pattern_Step2c1 )
    $stemmed_word = root
    $stemmed_word do (
          $word_len = len
          unset meem_found
          unset alef_found
          unset v_found
          unset case1
          unset case2
          unset case3
          unset case4
          unset case5
          unset case6
          unset case7
          unset case8
          unset case9
          unset root_found
          $fa = ''
          $ain = ''
          $lam1 = ''
          (
              $word_len == 4
              (
                  do Check_Pattern1
                  do (

                        (
                          meem_found
                          (
                                alef_found
                                Pattern_Step1a
                          )
                          or
                          (
                                not alef_found
                                (
                                    v_found
                                    Pattern_Step1a1
                                )
                                or
                                (
                                    not v_found
                                    Pattern_Step1a2
                                )
                          )
                        )
                        or
                        (
                           not meem_found
                           (
                              alef_found
                              Pattern_Step1b
                           )
                           or
                           (
                              v_found
                              Pattern_Step1c
                           )
                        )

                  )
                  (
                        root_found
                        (
                            $root = lam1
                            $root insert ain
                            $root insert fa
                        )
                  )
              )
          )
          or
          (
              $word_len == 5
              (
                        do Checks_Pattern2
                        do
                        (
                           (
                                 case1 ( case2 Pattern_Step2a)
                           )
                           or
                           (
                                 case3 ( case4 Pattern_Step2a1 )
                           )
                           or
                           (
                                 case5 Pattern_Step2c2
                           )
                           or
                           (
                                 case6 Pattern_Step2c4
                           )
                           or
                           (
                                 case7 Pattern_Step2c
                           )

                        )
              )
              (
                        root_found
                        (
                            $root = lam1
                            $root insert ain
                            $root insert fa
                        )
              )
          )
          or
          (
              $word_len == 6
              (
                    do Pattern_Checks3
                    do
                    (
                        (
                            case8 Pattern_Step3b
                        )
                        or
                        (
                            case9 Pattern_Step3c
                        )
                        or
                        (
                            do (
                                  Prefix_Step5_Verb
                                  Checks_Pattern2
                                  (
                                    case1 (case2 Pattern_Step2a)
                                  )

                               )
                        )

                    )
              )
              (
                    root_found
                    (
                        $root = lam1
                        $root insert ain
                        $root insert fa
                    )
              )

          )

    )
    $root do Normalize_post  // for root
    = root
)
